Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-408
Staff Judge Advocates; duties; restrictions.

(1) Convening authorities shall at all times communicate directly with their Staff Judge Advocates in matters relating to the administration of military justice; and the Staff Judge Advocate of any command is authorized to communicate directly with the State Judge Advocate.

(2) No person who has acted as a member, military judge, trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, defense counsel, or investigating officer in any case shall subsequently act as a Staff Judge Advocate to any reviewing authority upon the same case.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 8, p. 1555.